Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-1,116
Satisfactory evidence of ownership; violation; penalty.

(1) All livestock sold or otherwise disposed of shall be accompanied by a properly executed bill of sale in writing or, for cattle, satisfactory evidence of ownership or a certificate of inspection. All owners of or persons possessing livestock have a duty to exhibit, upon the request of the brand committee or its employees, either the bill of sale or other satisfactory evidence of ownership of the livestock.

(2) A violation of this section is an infraction. A peace officer shall have the authority to write a citation, which shall be waivable, to offenders in violation of this section. A fine under this section shall not exceed two hundred dollars per head for each offense. Violations shall be charged in the county in which the offense occurred.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 47;

Laws 2021, LB572, § 28;

Laws 2026, LB1187, § 15.
July 18, 2026